Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 7 Election Districts and Precincts

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 8 to 85.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 73 to 101.

§ 22-7-101.
Election districts.

The board of county commissioners with the advice or recommendation of the county clerk, no later than its first meeting in May in every general election year shall divide the county into not more than thirty (30) election districts. Each district shall be designated by number. Election districts shall be changed only at this designated meeting.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-113; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2001, ch. 29, § 1; 2012, ch. 9, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “May” for “April” in the first sentence.

Laws 2012, ch. 9 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.

§ 22-7-102.
Change in precinct boundary.

A precinct boundary shall not be changed unless a notice describing all proposed changes is posted on the county’s official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in the designated official newspaper of the county. The board shall also mail by certified mail return receipt requested copy of this notice to the county chairman of each political party in the county not later than fifteen (15) days before the meeting at which the proposed changes will be discussed. A proposed change in a precinct boundary may be finalized by the board only at the designated meeting. Each precinct shall be designated by number.

However, changes to municipal precinct boundaries due to the annexation of any territory shall be effective upon the date provided in the ordinance.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-114; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2014 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), substituted “changes is posted on the county's official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in the designated official newspaper of the county” for “changes is published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county” in the first sentence.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-7-103.
Establishing or altering election districts or precincts; designation of special precincts.

In establishing or altering election districts or voting precincts, the board of county commissioners shall be guided by the interests and convenience of the greatest number of electors involved. Election districts and voting precincts shall coincide with the boundary of a municipality or ward therein and school and community college trustee residence areas and shall not cross municipal boundaries except in cases where the board of county commissioners finds, and specifies in the minutes of its meeting the reasons why it is not practical to conform the boundaries of the election district or precinct to the municipal boundary.

For elections other than the primary and general election, the county commissioners may designate different precincts than those used in the general election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-115; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

§ 22-7-104.
Procedure following resolution altering precinct area.

Within five (5) days after the adoption of a resolution dividing or consolidating a precinct, or changing a precinct boundary, the county clerk shall send a certified copy of the resolution to the secretary of state and to the county chairman of each political party and notify by mail all registered electors receiving a new precinct number.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-116; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-7-105.
Election district number to precede precinct number.

Whenever they are both referred to, the election district number shall precede the voting precinct number.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-117.